Washington statutes.
RCW 18.11.260

Application of Consumer Protection Act.

A violation of this chapter is hereby declared to affect the public interest and to offend public policy. Any violation, act, or practice by an auctioneer or auction company which is unfair or deceptive, shall constitute an unfair or deceptive act or practice in violation of RCW 19.86.020. The remedies and sanctions provided in this section shall not preclude application of other available remedies and sanctions.

[ 1986 c 324 s 25.]